Maryland, session 2025, HB1524.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–13A–01.
(a) (1) The Wicomico County Board consists of [seven]:
– 1 –

Ch. 429 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) SEVEN nonpartisan elected voting members; AND
(II) ONE AT LEAST ONE STUDENT MEMBER.
(2) [The] BEGINNING WITH THE GENERAL ELECTION IN 2026, THE
seven ELECTED members shall be elected [as follows:
(i) One member] from each of the [five] SEVEN councilmanic
districts in the county, elected by the voters of that district[; and
(ii) Two members at large, elected by the voters of the county].
(b) (1) A candidate who becomes an elected member of the county board must
be a resident and registered voter of Wicomico County.
(2) (i) An elected member who no longer resides in Wicomico County
may not continue as a member of the board.
(ii) A member elected from a councilmanic district who no longer
resides in that district may not continue as a member of the board.
(3) If the boundary line of a Wicomico County councilmanic district is
changed, the term of an incumbent ELECTED member of the county board who no longer
resides in that councilmanic district because of the change is not affected during this term.
3–13A–02.
(a) The seven ELECTED members of the Wicomico County Board shall be elected:
(1) At the general election in 2018 and at the general election every 4 years
thereafter; and
(2) In accordance with § 3–13A–01 of this subtitle and Title 8, Subtitle 8 of
the Election Law Article.
(b) (1) The terms of the ELECTED members are as provided in this subsection.
(2) Each term of office begins on the first Monday in December after the
election of a member and until a successor is elected and qualifies.
(3) The term of office of each member is 4 years.
3–13A–03.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 429
(a) (1) There is a Wicomico County School Board Nominating Commission.
(2) The purpose of the Commission is to select nominees to recommend to
the Wicomico County Council as qualified candidates for appointment to fill a vacancy OF
AN ELECTED MEMBER on the Wicomico County Board.
3–13A–04.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Wicomico County
Council shall appoint an individual to fill a vacancy OF AN ELECTED MEMBER on the
county board in accordance with § 3–13A–03 of this subtitle.
(b) (1) If a vacancy for [a] AN ELECTED member occurs before the date that is
30 days before the date for filing a certificate of candidacy for the primary election in the
presidential election year, the individual appointed under subsection (a) of this section shall
serve only until a successor is elected by the voters at the next general election.
(2) Candidates for the vacated office may be nominated at a primary
election in the same manner as for any other position on the county board.
3–13A–06.
At the first meeting of the county board in December of each year, the county board
shall elect a chair and vice chair from among the ELECTED members.
3–13A–07.
(A) THE A STUDENT MEMBER OF THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL BE SELECTED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED BY THE COUNTY BOARD.
(B) (1) THE EACH STUDENT MEMBER SHALL:
(I) BE AN 11TH OR 12TH GRADE STUDENT IN GOOD STANDING
AND REGULARLY ENROLLED IN THE WICOMICO COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM;
(II) SERVE FOR 1 YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1 AFTER THE
SELECTION OF THE MEMBER;
(III) BE A NONVOTING MEMBER; AND
(IV) ADVISE THE COUNTY BOARD ON THE THOUGHTS AND
FEELINGS OF STUDENTS IN THE WICOMICO COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOLS.
– 3 –

Ch. 429 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) UNLESS INVITED TO ATTEND BY AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF A
MAJORITY OF THE ELECTED MEMBERS OF THE COUNTY BOARD, THE A STUDENT
MEMBER MAY NOT ATTEND A CLOSED SESSION OF THE COUNTY BOARD.
3–13A–08.
(A) (1) THE CHAIR OF THE COUNTY BOARD IS ENTITLED TO RECEIVE
ANNUALLY AS COMPENSATION THE GREATER OF:
(I) $4,000; OR
(II) A SALARY SET BY THE WICOMICO COUNTY COUNCIL.
(2) THE VICE CHAIR OF THE COUNTY BOARD AND THE OTHER
ELECTED MEMBERS OF THE COUNTY BOARD ARE ENTITLED TO RECEIVE ANNUALLY
AS COMPENSATION THE GREATER OF:
(I) $3,700; OR
(II) A SALARY SET BY THE WICOMICO COUNTY COUNCIL.
(B) AFTER SUBMITTING VOUCHERS UNDER THE RULES AND REGULATIONS
ADOPTED BY THE COUNTY BOARD, THE ELECTED MEMBERS ARE ENTITLED TO
RECEIVE REIMBURSEMENT FOR TRAVEL AND OTHER EXPENSES AS PROVIDED IN
THE COUNTY BOARD’S BUDGET.
(C) (1) ON THE SUBMISSION OF EXPENSE VOUCHERS, THE A STUDENT
MEMBER IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR TRAVEL AND OTHER EXPENSES
INCURRED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF OFFICIAL DUTIES FOR THE COUNTY BOARD.
(2) A STUDENT MEMBER MAY BE GRANTED A SCHOLARSHIP AS
AUTHORIZED BY THE COUNTY BOARD.
(2) (3) THE A STUDENT MEMBER IS NOT ENTITLED TO ANY
COMPENSATION OR PAYMENT OTHER THAN THAT SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
PARAGRAPHS (1) AND (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR THE STUDENT MEMBER’S WORK
AS THE A STUDENT MEMBER OF THE COUNTY BOARD.
4–107.
(e) [(6) Each member of the Wicomico County Board shall receive the following
amounts annually as compensation:
(i) Member …………………………………………………… $3,700; and
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 429
(ii) Chairman …………………………………………………….. $4,000.]
[(7)] (6) Each member of the Worcester County Board shall receive an
amount annually for traveling and other expenses as determined by the County
Commissioners, but in the amount of at least:
(i) Member …………………………………………………… $2,000; and
(ii) Chairman ……………………………………………………… $2,400.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 5 –